{"post-73203": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1505840807000", "message": "About an hour from the Kito Shrine on horse - through tough terrain and far from roads - lies a small shack that was once the home of a small family. It is now abandoned and few knows of its existence...\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "About an hour from the Kito Shrine on horse - through tough terrain and far from roads - lies a small shack that was once the home of a small family. It is now abandoned and few knows of its existence...\u00a0"}, "post-73207": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1505843410000", "message": "From time to time Yasuke wondered how she might feel back there. It was definitely not a comfy ride by any means, but perhaps a more gentle journey would work against both of their interests. Girls like her could be stubborn at times, so a little bit of 'softening her up' before they arrived might make sure things went a lot more smoothly when they arrived and it was question time. Speaking of which Yasuke could now see the abandoned shack that was their destination. It was situated on a small hill and the bushes and soft soil made it safer walking the last 40 meters or so on foot. Yasuke got off the horse and with a nod he greeted a couple of the thugs he had hired to stand guard outside and warn him of any movements in the dense forest. One never knew who missed her, but Yasuke was about to figure out. He stopped right besides the horse and glanced at the expensive looking kimono she was wearing and made a mental note of asking where she had gotten that. Yasuke then pulled her down from the horse letting her drop to the forest floor. He knew the soft grass would likely ensure a reasonably safe landing, but he didn't want her to feel handled gently. \"Up you go..!\" Yasuke said, still with the distorted voice, and dragged her to her feet grabbing the collar on her kimono. \"We're going this way. Stay on your feet!\" he commanded, as he dragged her up the hill, probably pacing her a bit faster than someone blindfolded would be comfortable going in this terrain. If she was to lose her footing, he would immediately drag her to her feet again before she touch the ground. Yasuke would then enter the shack and place her in front of an old fireplace on the wooden floor before closing the door. \"Good, no more immediate horse riding now, but if you want to go riding in the opposite direction anytime soon and in one peace...\" Yasuke said and paused. \"... then let's have a productive chat us two.\" he said and started rhythmically walking around the shack as his feet made the old floor creak. He wasn't exactly a seasoned interrogator, but he thought he had a way with asking questions that made people want to answer. Especially if something nasty would be the consequence of defiance. \"Nakatani-san.\" he said and let her wonder how he new her name. \"I will tell you two things. One: My time is important, but I will take as much time as necessary. Two: If you prolong the time we stay together out here, you will not like it. I will get my answers in some way though, and once I get them should I be sufficiently annoyed, I will tow you back behind the horse with a rope around your ankles. I hope we are clear?\" he asked as he grabbed her small jaw and squeezed it to make her feel the weight of his words. Hurting a helpless girl was not among his proudest deeds and if possible he would want to avoid it, but he had risked too much for this not to work out.\"Let's start with a bit of small talk okay? Good.\" he said calmly and to ensure he got her full attention. \"What a lovely and expensive looking kimon,! where did you get that? Who's the lucky guy?\" he asked sarcastically and awaited her response. Surely this was an easy question and she'd have a hard time explaining how she could afford that by herself. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "From time to time Yasuke wondered how she might feel back there. It was definitely not a comfy ride by any means, but perhaps a more gentle journey would work against both of their interests. Girls like her could be stubborn at times, so a little bit of 'softening her up' before they arrived might make sure things went a lot more smoothly when they arrived and it was question time. "}, "post-73235": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1505890617000", "message": "He might have thought she would get a safe landing, but with her hands tied she was unable to catch herself. Her shoulder would hit the ground first, making her groan a little bit from the thump on the ground. He was handling her rougher than she might have hoped for and on the way to the shed she would trip over things several times as she was paced along and every time she was just roughly put back into her feet. She lost one of her sandals along the way and could feel the soft grass under her foot. Slowly her nose would start to turn red as she was softly sniffling to herself. She wouldn't allow herself to sob, but she somehow couldn't hold back the few tears that escaped her. They were immediately soaked up by the cloth that covered her eyes, so maybe her capture wouldn't even notice it. When she was finally put down onto the floor, she was almost thankful for it. Her body was aching from the ride and being able to sit down on the floor gave her a little bit of relief from that. Her hair had gotten messy, her beautiful kimono was covered with grass stains and dirt and she was sure that she must have looked miserable right there. It also seemed to be a bit warmer at the place that he brought her, again something she was thankful for. He knew her name... She decided to make a note of that. If he knew her name, then maybe he was someone she had met before. She was still lost why anyone would want information from her, she didn't believe she knew anything of importance. Clearly, this man thought different about it. She was almost glad when the first question he asked was about her kimono, she knew she could answer this one easily. She had been starting to fear for her life with the threats he was making towards her and she wanted to make it home in one piece. \"It was a gift!\" she said fast, hoping that getting to the point would help to calm him down. \"It was a gift from a samurai named Isao, he lived in Katashima. I had lost all my kimono's from the time I had been a geisha, and he thought it would make me happy to receive some to wear.\" she paused a moment waiting to hear if he was satisfied with her answer. \"Please Sir, my hands. I can't feel them anymore... I won't run.\" she said, feeling defeated, hoping that now she gave him some information he would comply with her request.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He might have thought she would get a safe landing, but with her hands tied she was unable to catch herself. Her shoulder would hit the ground first, making her groan a little bit from the thump on the ground. He was handling her rougher than she might have hoped for and on the way to the shed she would trip over things several times as she was paced along and every time she was just roughly put back into her feet. She lost one of her sandals along the way and could feel the soft grass under her foot. Slowly her nose would start to turn red as she was softly sniffling to herself. She wouldn't allow herself to sob, but she somehow couldn't hold back the few tears that escaped her. They were immediately soaked up by the cloth that covered her eyes, so maybe her capture wouldn't even notice it. "}, "post-73248": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1505940300000", "message": "\"A gift from a samurai named Isao you say?\" Yasuke said skeptical. He had hoped the kimono would have tied her to someone in House Hizashi with power and influence but instead this seemed like a dead end. A moment Yasuke thought that perhaps he needed to put a little more pressure on her, but when his eyes caught her pitiful visage he somehow got the feeling she was too scared not to tell him the truth right now. Had he over done it? Yasuke scratched his chin but couldn't think of any point where he had been really brutal with her. At least this was like a coasy picnic compared to the few times Yasuke's old bandit enemies had gotten a hold of him, but still he was surprised that she had just sort of... given up. No struggle, no fight left in her. Still it surprised Yasuke to hear her pleading him to untie the tight ropes. Any interrogator worth anything would know exactly what to do now to put additional mental pressure on the victim, but somehow that only seemed necessary if she was struggling or Yasuke thought she was lying. That was not the case, and Yasuke didn't think she'd try to run - especially when still tied on the feet. \"Don't touch your blindfold under any circumstances.\" Yasuke said and rolled her over to untie the ropes around her wrists. Yasuke was about to let her try to sit up by herself, but instead he placed his hands on her shoulders and helped her sit upright again thinking her hands wouldn't have been of much help to her the next few minutes. \"There you go, now don't go asking any more favors!\" he said firmly. \"Asking favors will only prolong our stay and I believe I told you what happened then.\" he said, though not putting quite as much weight into his words this time. Yasuke knew he had no real leads to go on, so he decided to gamble a bit with the next question. It seemed she did have a thing with samurais after all and being the person she was, she probably valued protection from such people highly. \"You did great with the first question. I'd like to see the same result with the next question okay? I'm honest with you and you're honest with me.\" he said and took a deep breath. \"On the topic of love... Who are you currently seeing withing House Hizashi?\" Yasuke asked calmly and carefully observed her to see any signs that would tell him if she was trying to avoid answering his question honestly. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"A gift from a samurai named Isao you say?\" Yasuke said skeptical. He had hoped the kimono would have tied her to someone in House Hizashi with power and influence but instead this seemed like a dead end. A moment Yasuke thought that perhaps he needed to put a little more pressure on her, but when his eyes caught her pitiful visage he somehow got the feeling she was too scared not to tell him the truth right now. Had he over done it? Yasuke scratched his chin but couldn't think of any point where he had been really brutal with her. At least this was like a coasy picnic compared to the few times Yasuke's old bandit enemies had gotten a hold of him, but still he was surprised that she had just sort of... given up. No struggle, no fight left in her. "}, "post-73260": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1505994350000", "message": "\"Yes, from Katashima.\" she added after he repeated her answer, making sure he understood her explanation. She didn't want him to misunderstand her and then later call her out on her answers, even when she answered them truthfully. When the ties left her hands, she immediately could feel the blood rushing back into them. She put them on her lap and started to rub them, hoping the feeling would soon return. She wouldn't reach for the blindfold at any point, she was not looking to anger her captor anymore then he already seemed to be with her. When the feelings in her hands eventually came back, all she felt was the pain in her hands. The blood vessels were expanding and her body seemed to pump more blood in them as it normally would, causing the pain. All she could do was keep rubbing them and hope that soon they would return to normal. She was just thankful to get the blood flow back into them. She started to notice that his voice was starting to soften after he had removed the ropes from her. The heavy anger had left it and he seemed to be more patient with her. It made her feel a little bit more comfortable about the situation. Maybe if she just answered him truthfully, he would just let her go. But that thought soon changed when he asked her the next question. She had only a second to think before he would become suspicious of her not answering. She couldn't tell him about Kojuro... If she admitted to being his lover he might use her to get a ransom. After all, if he wasn't after money, why else did he ask about where she got her kimono first? And even if he didn't, she could get Kojuro in big trouble if people found out from her mouth. \"I am just a servant girl at the Hizashi household, Sir. I am too low of birth to be with anyone within the Hizashi.\" She wasn't lying. She still didn't understand why Kojuro would choose her as she was just a servant within his household. She didn't deny she was seeing anyone, but she hoped it would throw him off the question as her answer about her kimono did. \"Why am I here Sir? What do you want from me? If it is money you are after, I don't have any.\" she said. She had tried to keep her tears back, but now that she had actually started to ask him what he wanted, fear gripped her once again. She started to slowly sob again. She just wanted to go home. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Yes, from Katashima.\" she added after he repeated her answer, making sure he understood her explanation. She didn't want him to misunderstand her and then later call her out on her answers, even when she answered them truthfully. "}, "post-73264": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1506012919000", "message": "\"Is that really true?\" Yasuke asked skeptical. Indeed it wasn't obvious if she was lying or telling the truth, but Yasuke thought that if indeed she was having an affair with anyone inside the mansion, she would have learned to spew out a lie pretty quickly when asked about it. He scratched his head an tapped his foot on the floor trying to figure out his next move when suddenly she starting asking him why she was there. Yasuke noticed the girl had slowly started crying, something that surprised Yasuke as he had just loosened the ropes that bound her hands, and they were even starting to get their normal color back. Was he that cruel to her? The feeling struck Yasuke harder than he had thought, but he knew he had to stay composed. \"Crying won't get you home.\" he said with a cold voice. It was a long time since he last had offered comforting words to anyone and much less a crying girl, but Yasuke thought that he'd probably have to make her feel a little bit safer with the whole situation. \"Okay listen up.\" Yasuke said as he reapplied his scarf in front of the mouth as it was getting hard to distort his voice unless he made it sound intimidating. \"As far is I know, you're innocent and you deserve to go back home in one piece - and if you compose yourself and answer my questions truthfully... you will. Today.\" Yasuke said and knelt down and put his hand on her shoulder. \"I promise you that. I'm not asking for anything you don't have, I'm just looking for the true answer to my questions. I know that having an affair for someone like you must be kept a secret - but you have my word, that anything you tell me is safe with me. Neither you or your lover will suffer at all. He will never even know you told me... In fact it will be as if this never happened.\" Yasuke said and started loosening the ropes binding her feet together. \"Now isn't that much more comfortable?\" he said and stood up again hoping his words and actions would calm her down enough so they could make proper progress. \"Now please tell me who you are currently seeing and we will be a whole lot closer to you returning back home.\" Yasuke said and hoped she would bring something useful to the table. He was getting impatient inside his head even though he knew he had lots of time as this girl was perhaps slowly disarming Yasuke. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Is that really true?\" Yasuke asked skeptical. Indeed it wasn't obvious if she was lying or telling the truth, but Yasuke thought that if indeed she was having an affair with anyone inside the mansion, she would have learned to spew out a lie pretty quickly when asked about it. He scratched his head an tapped his foot on the floor trying to figure out his next move when suddenly she starting asking him why she was there. Yasuke noticed the girl had slowly started crying, something that surprised Yasuke as he had just loosened the ropes that bound her hands, and they were even starting to get their normal color back. Was he that cruel to her? The feeling struck Yasuke harder than he had thought, but he knew he had to stay composed. "}, "post-73403": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1506331657000", "message": "Did he notice her lie? No he couldn't have... she didn't even hesitate to tell her answer. \"Why would anyone want to be with the servant girl?\" she added, hoping that would be enough to convince him of her lie. Only then she could feel him getting close to her, she backed off a little bit but was able to keep her hands to her lap, instead of raising them to push him away from her. She would listen to his words, but when he put his hand sudden on her shoulders she backed away from him. The sudden touched had scared her, she had not seen it coming since she had been blindfolded. \"Why would I believe you!? You are a liar! You kidnap me while I am praying, disrupting my words to the gods. Bring me to this place that reeks of ashes and sweaty men and claim that anything I say here will be safe? You might think I am just a na\u00efve girl, but I am not! There is a reason you brought me here, there is a reason you want this information. So don't lie to me and tell me that it is safe!\"By the time she had gotten the words out, she already regretted them. She had let her emotions get the best of her and shouted the first things that had come to her mind. She felt anger towards this man, who was trying to lul her in a sense of comfort after he had put her on the back of a horse as if she had been a bag of flour. But more then anything she was afraid now, afraid he would hurt her. Afraid he was going to hit her or worse. She would brace herself, fixing her ears to make herself aware of any movement he might make towards her. She considered taking off the blindfold, wondering if she had already reached his limit or if doing so would only make him more angry. In the end she didn't. She just sat there, hunched down with her arms in front of her in protection, hoping for the best. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Did he notice her lie? No he couldn't have... she didn't even hesitate to tell her answer. \"Why would anyone want to be with the servant girl?\" she added, hoping that would be enough to convince him of her lie. "}, "post-73425": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1506376950000", "message": "Yasuke sighed deeply and crossed his arms as he tapped his arms with his fingers. If this girl had any secret affairs, she had no intentions of telling them it seemed. If she really kept some deep secret and resisted Yasuke's questioning he was almost prone to admiring her resilience. But once again he observed her trying to find a 'tell', the thing that gave away if the opponent lied. Unfortunately this wasn't easier than in gambling, and while Yasuke had a decent pokerface, his ability to detect one wasn't as well developed.\u00a0The girl's sudden outburst came almost as a shock to Yasuke. Was she ready to bite back now? After all this, she finds confidence to bite back at the slightest hint of Yasuke going easy on her? It was true though, Yasuke was a damn liar, but maybe not the best of the bunch as it seemed she had seen through his intentions. But being yelled at like that wasn't something that really disturbed Yasuke apart from the initial shock. He was used to people's aggressive behavior towards him and gave back at least as much when needed. She didn't appear like she had anymore in her though as she seemed to withdraw into herself almost as if expecting Yasuke to hurt her. He wasn't going to though -  this was far from enough to unsettle him to that point. \"Are you finished now?\" Yasuke asked calmly but firmly as he sat down a couple of feet in front of her. \"I do find it funny - now that your feet and hands are untied - that you immediately seek to dominate me with your words as if you think you have the upper hand. But look at this. You know what this is?\" Yasuke said and silently drew his katana. \"Of course you don't, because you didn't dare remove the scarf from your eyes. Being blind to what is right in front of you is the fool's source of courage.\" Yasuke said and eased his katana back into its sheath making the sound of sheathing slightly audible along with the slight 'click' when the hilt touched the metal fittings on the sheath. \"Fools get hurt or die prematurely, and despite your rash words I don't think you seek that kind of end, do you, Nakatani?\" Yasuke asked as he once again got up.\"I wonder if the fool will be the one answering my next question too?\" Yasuke said, sounding as if he was speaking to himself as much as to Nakatani. Yasuke wanted to remove all doubt whether she was lying to him before considering what he would do if this was all unsuccessful. \"Tell me who you are close with at House Hizashi? Is it Genji? Takahashi? Anzen? Maybe even Kojuro?\" Yasuke asked, trying to spray a few of the most well known names out. \"You need to think closely on your answer now. I won't have anymore lying or dragging me around by my nose!\" Yasuke coerced and couldn't help but feeling annoyed by how easily his feelings were deceived by this little servant girl. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke sighed deeply and crossed his arms as he tapped his arms with his fingers. If this girl had any secret affairs, she had no intentions of telling them it seemed. If she really kept some deep secret and resisted Yasuke's questioning he was almost prone to admiring her resilience. But once again he observed her trying to find a 'tell', the thing that gave away if the opponent lied. Unfortunately this wasn't easier than in gambling, and while Yasuke had a decent pokerface, his ability to detect one wasn't as well developed.\u00a0"}, "post-73476": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1506501017000", "message": "He was wrong... She didn't have the outburst because of she thought she had the upper hand now. It was because she felt like that more trapped than she ever had been in her life. She couldn't defend herself, even if she wanted to, she didn't know how. Her whole life had been spent looking pretty for others, learning her dance routines, playing her instruments and learning how to use the right words. She had never been prepared for a situation like this. She felt useless, like none of her skills mattered to her now. She was dependant on others for her protection, and those others were nowhere around. The realization once again made her sob, even if she didn't want to. She listened to his words but found it hard to concentrate on them, lost in her own thoughts. She felt utterly alone in this room and felt like she needed a miracle. Maybe telling the turth was the right choice after all. But he was a liar, why would he not have lied about returning her? Sure he would place a random on her head, hoping Kojuro would pay for her. She wrapped her arms around herself, suddenly feeling chilly and cold. \"K-kojuro...\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He was wrong... She didn't have the outburst because of she thought she had the upper hand now. It was because she felt like that more trapped than she ever had been in her life. She couldn't defend herself, even if she wanted to, she didn't know how. Her whole life had been spent looking pretty for others, learning her dance routines, playing her instruments and learning how to use the right words. She had never been prepared for a situation like this. She felt useless, like none of her skills mattered to her now. She was dependant on others for her protection, and those others were nowhere around. "}, "post-73486": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1506549756000", "message": "Yasuke was about to throw the towel in the ring, after all it seemed like this girl sobbed just being pushed a little. Perhaps he would never get anything useful out of her and perhaps she really didn't know... but suddenly while Yasuke scratched his head her lips moved and a word came out.\"W-what did you say..?\" Yasuke asked surprised. He heard what she said, but him of all people? \"Are you completely certain?!?\" he almost yelled excitedly. There was no doubt in his mind that she had finally figured that lies wouldn't get her home. This meant Kojuro - who everybody knew was looking for a wife - already had one he held dear. Whatever the implications of this he'd let someone else decide, but indeed this had to be valuable info. But as the thoughts raced through his head it was as if his instincts suddenly violently woke him up. 'Dangerous' was their message, and Yasuke suddenly remembered Kojuro's behavior when Yasuke had called Wuppo 'a monster' and he couldn't imagine his wrath if he ever figured out that Yasuke had kidnapped his loved one. An angry man wasn't someone who Yasuke cared about, too much stupidity was often the symptom of raging men. But Kojuro didn't seem like a guy who lost his temper easily, he was the type being hell bend on revenge - and with an army behind him he'd be able to carry it out pretty convincingly.The outcome of the questioning being 'Kojuro' was probably not only the best, but also the most dangerous of them all. If Yasuke was to avoid his skull becoming Kojuro's chamber pot, he'd have to make sure this girl was returned home in one piece, and that he himself was completely outside of suspicion. He walked a little back and forth in the room until the idea \"Keep your friends closer, but keep your enemies closer\" came to his mind. Really turning that notion upside down might work to his advantage right now. Maybe this whole situation could play to his advantage in more ways than one? It might, but only if he was proactive, so there were no time for any more questions. Yasuke looked at the girl who's tears were still running down her cheeks and almost felt pity for what he was going to do now as he knelt down before her.\u00a0\"Listen up closely. I'm going to keep you here for a while and question you some more, and when I'm sure I've got what I've been coming for, I'll ransom you back to your dear Kojuro. So don't worry, you'll get back in one piece... eventually.\" he said with a cold voice. Making her believe this would make things a lot easier for Yasuke, though seeing her in this state kind of made him feel bad anyway, and he reached for the bag he had brought along to sate his own appetite. \"Take this. I'm going to go outside for a while, but my buddies are always near the house, so even though I'm letting you have your hands and feet untied, don't even think of removing that scarf from your eyes!\" he said with a strict voice. \"Instead eat this until I get back soon.\" he said and handed her a loaf of bread and a bottle of water as he put on his cape and mask again and left the shack. \"Huh, what are you doing evesdropping? I said 'watch the perimeter', not 'watch the walls not falling down'!\" Yasuke reprimanded him, as one of the thugs he hired was leaning casually against the wall of the shack. With a cheeky smirk he seemed less than interested in Yasuke's words though.\"If you're going out, I can keep reeeallyyy close watch over her...\" he said, but hardly had he finished his sentance as Yasuke hooked two fingers inside the guy's cheeks and slammed his head into the wall before grabbing his head and burying it well into the mud, only ears free - the mud depriving him of air. Yasuke then put himself on top of him with a knee in the thug's back and leaned his head close to the struggling thug's ear. This was probably Yasuke's fault for choosing the sort of lowly thugs that wouldn't lift their brows even an inch when a masked man approached and paid them gold to look the other way when he kidnapped a defenseless girl. If this was out of principle for not being respectful to him or Yasuke's way of at least paying something back to the poor girl he's kidnapped, he didn't know. But this guy was going to learn a lesson, that much was certain.\u00a0\"Listen up you filthy scum!!! She's much more valuable than you'd ever believe, but only if she remains emotionally and physically in one peace. And if she's not like that when I get back, I'll make tea off your balls and toast with an ogre I know well!\" Yasuke shouted as he finally let the thug get some air and pulled his head free. \"If this succeeds, there will be ten times as much gold in it than I already paid you and you can use it for whatever you like at the local whore house. But until then, you and your friends keep your heads cool okay?!?\" Yasuke commanded and looked at the guy with a gaze that left no doubts about his intentions if the guy did not accept. In the end Yasuke was content that he had made his point clear and without uttering a word, he went to his horse and set course towards the Hizashi mansion. Yasuke peered down his hakama and shoes. That little squabble had left him extremely dirt and now he had to make up an excuse for that too.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke was about to throw the towel in the ring, after all it seemed like this girl sobbed just being pushed a little. Perhaps he would never get anything useful out of her and perhaps she really didn't know... but suddenly while Yasuke scratched his head her lips moved and a word came out."}, "post-73506": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1506622138000", "message": "His sudden outburst towards her only made her brace herself. She couldn't bring herself to answer his questions anymore and she just sobbed again. She told the truth, why did he get mad at her? She crawled away from him a little bit, hoping to put some distance between the both of them. When he continued to say he would keep her even longer and ransom her out to Kojuro, she felt like the worst person in the world. She knew she would get Kojuro in trouble and still she said his name. Why had she? Why had she not put up a strong face and stayed with her lie of just being a servant in the mansion? She was so weak. She could never have protected herself, but now she didn't even protect the ones she held dear. She just hugged her own knees and subbed into them. She didn't touch the food that was given to her, she didn't touch her blindfold. She just sat there on the floor, curled up in a little ball, wondering about what she had done. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His sudden outburst towards her only made her brace herself. She couldn't bring herself to answer his questions anymore and she just sobbed again. She told the truth, why did he get mad at her? She crawled away from him a little bit, hoping to put some distance between the both of them. "}, "post-73653": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1506974659000", "message": "Yasuke nodded and he rode out of the gate towards the Kita Shrine, leading Kojuro up close to the same road he had initially taken to get there.\"I think her kimono could have been yellow with some patterns, but I'm not completely sure.\" Yasuke said as they approached the place where Yasuke had taken Naka on his horse. \"I saw him ride that way between those trees. Maybe we can follow the trail, Kojuro-dono!\" Yasuke and pointed in the general direction he knew he had traveled earlier that day.Yasuke shook his head. \"There were no one with him at that time, but we would be foolish to think that such a guy wouldn't have the help of others. Particularly if he's a bandit and not a ronin.\" Yasuke pointed out. He wouldn't want to sound too knowing, but didn't want Kojuro to face unexpected resistance either. It was a tough balance. \"Kojuro-dono. We stand a good chance if we're only two. That way we move faster and are less likely to be spotted in a forest like this!\" Yasuke said, trying to encourage Kojuro, who seemed to agree to that approach. \"I'll track them down the best I can. I was pretty good at this a few years ago.\" Yasuke said and scouted around. \"There they are, the tracks!\" he said and pointed at some deep tracks embedded in the forest floor before leading Kojuro on. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke nodded and he rode out of the gate towards the Kita Shrine, leading Kojuro up close to the same road he had initially taken to get there."}, "post-73655": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1506975976000", "message": "They rode up to the shrine and Kojuro surveyed where Yasuke pointed out that the man had taken Nakatani. He gazed at the small shrine briefly where he and Nakatani had given offerings to the kami, and he prayed that that kami would lend them its aid. It couldn't be too happy of having the peace of its shrine disturbed, but that was a flimsy thing to rely on. \"He could be just a hired hand for someone else,\" Kojuro replied, agreeing with Yasuke's assessment that he probably had help. But whether this was a small time opportunistic attack or some kind of well-orchestrated operation it was hard to know. The only way was to pursue the abductor and find out. They headed off after the horseman who had left none-to-subtle tracks on the muddy forest floor. \"I'm aware of that,\" he replied. \"Otherwise I would have brought some guards. But I don't want to attract any attention that might make them think they had failed and just kill the hostage\u2026\" he swallowed down a lump in his throat as he rode on. Perhaps if they had taken her for a ransom or kidnapped her to sell her to a geisha house it would be in their interests not to hurt her - he could only hope that was the case. Yasuke pointed out the rather obvious horse tracks before they moved on. \"Good, that's good to know,\" he replied, rather humouring in him in thinking he was spotting something no one else could. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "They rode up to the shrine and Kojuro surveyed where Yasuke pointed out that the man had taken Nakatani. He gazed at the small shrine briefly where he and Nakatani had given offerings to the kami, and he prayed that that kami would lend them its aid. It couldn't be too happy of having the peace of its shrine disturbed, but that was a flimsy thing to rely on. \"He could be just a hired hand for someone else,\" Kojuro replied, agreeing with Yasuke's assessment that he probably had help. But whether this was a small time opportunistic attack or some kind of well-orchestrated operation it was hard to know. The only way was to pursue the abductor and find out. They headed off after the horseman who had left none-to-subtle tracks on the muddy forest floor. \"I'm aware of that,\" he replied. \"Otherwise I would have brought some guards. But I don't want to attract any attention that might make them think they had failed and just kill the hostage\u2026\" he swallowed down a lump in his throat as he rode on. Perhaps if they had taken her for a ransom or kidnapped her to sell her to a geisha house it would be in their interests not to hurt her - he could only hope that was the case. Yasuke pointed out the rather obvious horse tracks before they moved on. \"Good, that's good to know,\" he replied, rather humouring in him in thinking he was spotting something no one else could. "}, "post-73659": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1506977465000", "message": "\"We shouldn't lose heart, those bastards would probably have done so at the shrine, if that was their aim.\" Yasuke said trying to keep Kojuro calm. He didn't really know if he was the type to lose heart, but he wouldn't risk it. \"But I believe your assessment was right, Kojuro-dono.\" Yasuke said and nodded. \"You're very funny, Kojuro-dono.\" Yasuke said and laughed rather awkwardly. No, he wasn't being funny at all. Yasuke felt the noble snoot was looking down on him and briefly thought it had probably been better if he delivered Naka to his doorstep. He took a deep breath trying to cool himself down. No this wouldn't work at all, he had to keep cool himself. \"Kojuro look!\" Yasuke said as he had slowed down a bit knowing they approached the shack. Yasuke spotted one of his paid guards standing at a tree peeing. \"The trails leads right past that guy and I see something resembling a house or a shack all the way behind those trees!\" Yasuke told Kojuro expecting him to put two and two together and not get three. \"It could be a guard post, should we... sneak up on him?\" Yasuke asked with a smirk. \"This is... damn it hurts sooo bad! Why does it feel like it's burning whenever I take a fucking leak!\" the guy guy exclaimed frustrated, as he slowly watered the tree with a face distorted in pain and sweat running down his cheeks. He was wearing worn clothes and had shoulder long greasy hair standing a little shorter than the average guy. \"What annoys me even more is having such a hot little chick laying in there and we have to stay outside in the mud standing guard not getting to even cop a feel! I mean who exactly is going to come save that chick out here?\" he mumbled bitterly.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"We shouldn't lose heart, those bastards would probably have done so at the shrine, if that was their aim.\" Yasuke said trying to keep Kojuro calm. He didn't really know if he was the type to lose heart, but he wouldn't risk it. \"But I believe your assessment was right, Kojuro-dono.\" Yasuke said and nodded. "}, "post-73853": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1507463735000", "message": "\u201cNot everyone is quite as blas\u00e9 about offending the spirits as you,\u201d Kojuro replied to Yasuke\u2019s words of encouragement. He wasn\u2019t really sure what Yasuke was finding quite so funny. Was he nervous or just had an odd sense of humour? Now wasn\u2019t the time to concern himself with it \u2013 Sou Yasuke was an unconventional person, but he had done Kojuro a great service bringing him here. He wasn\u2019t going to judge a few strange foibles of the man, and besides he had other things on his mind. Namely Nakatani. He couldn\u2019t think about her too hard, and let himself be distracted, he needed to focus on the task in hand \u2013 finding and killing this masked man and whatever associates he had. He looked the way Yasuke pointed, spotting the urinating man and the distant shack. \u201cWe\u2019ll leave the horses here and go on foot,\u201d he said, as they were on the edge of some thicker wooded undergrowth, not wanting the  sound of approaching hoofbeats to alert any of the kidnappers. The pissing man seemed absorbed in his occupation as Kojuro approached, sword in hand. With the point of the tachi close to the man's throat, Kojuro waiting the few seconds it took for the somewhat afflicted gentleman to finish his business, as he listened to the muttering about the girl in the hut with narrowed eyes. Who was going to save the chick? \u201cThat would be me,\u201d he replied, and the man jumped. \u201cIf you make any sudden moves or try to raise an alarm, I'll kill you. Turn around.\u201d No doubt he could feel the killing intent of Kojuro and knew that he was serious. His hand stopped reaching for the dagger at his belt and he turned, coming face to face with the sharp point of the sword at his throat. \u201cWhere is she? How many of you are there?\u201d Kojuro spoke quietly with an undertone of menace that the scruffy man could feel as much as hear, and he decided the wiser course was to answer. \u201cIn \u2026 there's a hut \u2013 a shack \u2013 just over behind those trees,\u201d he whispered urgently, feeling the urge to pee again even though he had just gone. \u201cNone of us touched her I swear \u2013 there's three of us \u2013 and the Masked Man who hired us \u2013 and \u2026 and those other guys that Hanbei got to pay him back \u2013 three I think. Yes. That's it!\u201d He swallowed hard, sweating. Having received this information, perhaps the man spotted a subtle movement that meant Kojuro would kill him anyway, and quickly went for his dagger, seeing a last chance to escape death, but Kojuro's sword sliced into the side of his neck and he went down, blood welling from the wound and his startled mouth, that quickly covered his raggedy clothing and the ground were he fell.. Kojuro pulled his sword free from the man's neck. That's how I would have gone, he  thought, watching the man die, if I hadn't blocked that blade, back then.  He wiped the blood from the blade of his sword silently, before looking up over to where he had left Yasuke at the edge of the trees. \u201cDid you hear that? Come on,\u201d he said, impatient to keep going. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cNot everyone is quite as blas\u00e9 about offending the spirits as you,\u201d Kojuro replied to Yasuke\u2019s words of encouragement. He wasn\u2019t really sure what Yasuke was finding quite so funny. Was he nervous or just had an odd sense of humour? Now wasn\u2019t the time to concern himself with it \u2013 Sou Yasuke was an unconventional person, but he had done Kojuro a great service bringing him here. He wasn\u2019t going to judge a few strange foibles of the man, and besides he had other things on his mind. Namely Nakatani. He couldn\u2019t think about her too hard, and let himself be distracted, he needed to focus on the task in hand \u2013 finding and killing this masked man and whatever associates he had. "}, "post-73889": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1507576962000", "message": "\"It seems I can hardly get a word across without offending the spirits...\" Yasuke mumbled very muted to himself. Kojuro seemed like he preferred to take care of the peeing man himself, and Yasuke squatted down and kept a vigilant look out for the two other guys he had hired. One would probably still be covered in mud and most likely in a fiery mood too. But oh well, two trained samurai against three band... nope, against two bandits... wouldn't even be fight. A quick slash from Kojuro had already reduced the opposition from three to two. It seemed like Kojuro shared Nakatani's feelings the way he took charge and it might even end up with him claiming all the slashing for himself. Yasuke had to admit that he had technique to back up his position within the clan. Anyone can slash someone's throat, but that was a clean one and with no hesitation after sensing the opponents attack. And that's more impressive than one might think, Yasuke thought. \"No I didn't Kojuro-dono, what did he say? Are we at the right place?\" Yasuke asked as he had silently closed in on Kojuro. Yasuke quickly glanced at the dead bandit and briefly considered dipping into his pockets and retrieving the gold Yasuke had paid him. \"Let's keep 5 foot of distance than I'll have your back, Kojuro-dono. It concerns me that we haven't spotted the others yet.\" Yasuke said and - if Kojuro agreed - would quickly take back the small sack of gold the dead guy would need anyway before following Kojuro in whatever direction he chose to go.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"It seems I can hardly get a word across without offending the spirits...\" Yasuke mumbled very muted to himself. Kojuro seemed like he preferred to take care of the peeing man himself, and Yasuke squatted down and kept a vigilant look out for the two other guys he had hired. One would probably still be covered in mud and most likely in a fiery mood too. But oh well, two trained samurai against three band... nope, against two bandits... wouldn't even be fight. A quick slash from Kojuro had already reduced the opposition from three to two. It seemed like Kojuro shared Nakatani's feelings the way he took charge and it might even end up with him claiming all the slashing for himself. Yasuke had to admit that he had technique to back up his position within the clan. Anyone can slash someone's throat, but that was a clean one and with no hesitation after sensing the opponents attack. And that's more impressive than one might think, Yasuke thought. "}, "post-74039": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1507836062000", "message": "\u201cWe are,\u201d he said to Yasuke's question, turning to face the little half-hidden shack that they had spotted among the trees. \u201cI believe that must be it. According to him there could be half a dozen opponents up there,\u201d Kojuro added, \u201cso be on your guard.\u201d He gave Yasuke a companionable, yet mirthless smile, knowing as he did that Yasuke was a warrior worth his salt who needed no warnings to be alert. The bandit's blood could still be heard welling up from the severed jugular vein after a moment of silence descended between them. Then Yasuke revealed his plan, which Kojuro vetoed with a shake of his head. \u201cStay with me, the more quickly we can take them out the better \u2013 and better watch each other's backs. We don't need a vanguard and rearguard.\u201d He began to move forward quickly, expecting Yasuke to keep up, until they had a better view of the hut and could see how many men currently guarded it. The bandit's word was not necessarily the most reliable. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cWe are,\u201d he said to Yasuke's question, turning to face the little half-hidden shack that they had spotted among the trees. \u201cI believe that must be it. According to him there could be half a dozen opponents up there,\u201d Kojuro added, \u201cso be on your guard.\u201d He gave Yasuke a companionable, yet mirthless smile, knowing as he did that Yasuke was a warrior worth his salt who needed no warnings to be alert. The bandit's blood could still be heard welling up from the severed jugular vein after a moment of silence descended between them. Then Yasuke revealed his plan, which Kojuro vetoed with a shake of his head. \u201cStay with me, the more quickly we can take them out the better \u2013 and better watch each other's backs. We don't need a vanguard and rearguard.\u201d He began to move forward quickly, expecting Yasuke to keep up, until they had a better view of the hut and could see how many men currently guarded it. The bandit's word was not necessarily the most reliable. "}, "post-74046": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1507843513000", "message": "\"Half a doz... I mean... That's a lot just for a guarding one girl.\" Yasuke said and scratched his chin, trying to pretend not to be surprised. He had only hired three. Yasuke had almost reached down towards the dead bugger, as Kojuro chose to veto against Yasuke's plan. \"I see...\" Yasuke said and silently clenched his teeth. Well, it was a trifle thing, but seeing a dead man with gold in his pockets and not emptying them, was something that went against Yasuke's normal habits. Yasuke had no choice, and followed Kojuro closely. With more thugs around, it was probably wiser that way.As they approached the shack, they were able to get a pretty good view of it from behind a couple of bushes. It was an old shack and apart from the sliding door, there were small holes all over and few straight lines remained as the roof seemed to cave in. \"I see only two, Kojuro-dono.\" Yasuke said and tried to see if he could make out more. Maybe Kojuro had heard wrong, because the ones he could see were the ones he had hired. There was Hanbei, the one who seemed to be one to command the most respect among the three hired guards - maybe because of his bulky build. He was still covered in mud and even his thick moustache had brownish dirt in it. He looked like some kind of samurai wannabe with a messy top knot and a worn, grey Yukata. Chobei was more slender and pretty tall with short hair and a and an expressionless, gaunt face. He was carrying a club on his left side, which was about an arms length along with a hidden knife on the back. Hanbei was more traditional and used a katana, but a pretty worn and chipped one it seemed. \"What are your orders, Kojuro-dono? Do we attack head on?\" Yasuke asked and looked to Kojuro to take the lead. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Half a doz... I mean... That's a lot just for a guarding one girl.\" Yasuke said and scratched his chin, trying to pretend not to be surprised. He had only hired three. "}, "post-74122": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508096976000", "message": "\u201cThey must know she has value,\u201d Kojuro said, and then regarded Yasuke thoughtfully for a moment, before moving on. He knew she had value too, and although Yasuke had pretended he had no idea who the girl was, he had come straight to Kojuro, which made him think that perhaps he known after all, and at least suspected the connection between Nakatani and himself. Yet Yasuke had discreetly said nothing. He was a strange man to figure out, yet Kojuro felt a great sense of gratitude towards him that Yasuke had come straight to him, and kept quiet. \u201cWell, he didn't seem like the most reliable person,\u201d he replied as they watched the two guards from the bushes. One was even more mud splattered than Yasuke, the other seemed to have escaped whatever his friend had fallen in. He observed their weapons and their general demeanor, quickly sizing up the bulky one with the sword as the most dangerous opponent. He had a more crafty look, the other seemed merely bored. \u201cYes, get their attention and engage them as fast as possible, and try to get between them and the door. I'll take the one on the right.\u201d And with that he leaped from the bushes and ran towards Hanbei, his tachi still unsheathed, held out to his right side as he charged towards him. Once he was within a few paces, he raised the blade, put his left hand to the hilt and brought it around in an arc that would cut Hanbei from shoulder to groin if left uninterrupted. Hanbei saw the movement ahead, expecting it to be the masked ronin returning and started to contemplate his revenge, but he wasn't expecting two samurai to come charging up with swords drawn. Nevertheless, he reacted quickly and as Kojuro brought down his blade, Hanbei caught the strike with his own weapon. As the two swords locked just above the guard, it seemed a matter of whether Hanbei's greater strength would force Kojuro's sword away before his rusty and dented blade gave way under the pressure. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cThey must know she has value,\u201d Kojuro said, and then regarded Yasuke thoughtfully for a moment, before moving on. He knew she had value too, and although Yasuke had pretended he had no idea who the girl was, he had come straight to Kojuro, which made him think that perhaps he known after all, and at least suspected the connection between Nakatani and himself. Yet Yasuke had discreetly said nothing. He was a strange man to figure out, yet Kojuro felt a great sense of gratitude towards him that Yasuke had come straight to him, and kept quiet. "}, "post-74134": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1508103291000", "message": "\"I'm on that left guy then!\" Yasuke said and followed Kojuro shortly after he jumped at Hanbei. Damned that Hanbei, Yasuke hoped Kojuro wouldn't go trip over a branch or something like that and go lose his life to him - that would be too pitiful. And although Kojuro really did piss Yasuke off at times, he respected him as a warrior and a capable leader - very unlike Hanbei who was just a small time gangster who loved to feel powerful. Yasuke more or less jumped at the other guy with a primal war cry. He was a tall guy and Yasuke thought he'd like to bring him down a bit, so why not go for those bamboo like legs? The guy instantly swung his club towards Yasuke with a great arc, but it was the predictable reaction and Yasuke dodged it before drawing his sword with a swing intending to cut off his his legs at the knees. To Yasuke's surprise he was faster than he seemed and moved just out of reach of Yasuke's swing. Yasuke backtracked and put a few paces of distance between him. Tactics were changed, he couldn't get between him and the door, but he needed to draw him away from Kojuro's fight so his unorthodox fighting style wouldn't intervene with Kojuro's more disciplined fighting style and by chance cause problems for his partner. --------\"When that masked baboon comes back I'll...\" Hanbei said as he suddenly turned his attention to the bushes nearby. \"Someone's coming..!\" he said as he saw how that a young brown haired samurai flew out of the bushes with drawn sword. \"As if..!!\" he said and just managed to draw his sword to block the attacking samurai's attack. He had good technique, and Hanbei knew he had to rely on strength and cunning. He then pushed back the attacking samurai both with his katana and a pushing front kick trying to establish some kind of status quo to stop the advantage of their surprise attack. \"I don't know who you are, but you're probably after the girl. Well I wonder what's left of her... Did we hang her, stab her full of holes... or other bad things? Huh samurai, you thought you were going to become a hero?\" he taunted Kojuro, knowing he probably had to gain the psychological advantage here. At any sign of his opponent becoming disheartened or his will wavering, he would go for the critical strike immediately. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I'm on that left guy then!\" Yasuke said and followed Kojuro shortly after he jumped at Hanbei. Damned that Hanbei, Yasuke hoped Kojuro wouldn't go trip over a branch or something like that and go lose his life to him - that would be too pitiful. And although Kojuro really did piss Yasuke off at times, he respected him as a warrior and a capable leader - very unlike Hanbei who was just a small time gangster who loved to feel powerful. "}, "post-74226": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508271509000", "message": "Hanbei's undisciplined manner gave Kojuro an opening, as he broadcast his intent with his body language, and the emotion on his face. Spotting his intent to push forward, Kojuro stepped back and to the right, letting the locked swords pivot around each other, freeing his blade as Hanbei moved forward with both his katana and kick. Hanbei's momentum, pushing against a force that no longer pushed back, propelled him forward and off balance, as Kojuro brought his tachi around in a horizontal strike to the left side of Hanbei's waist. He turned to face Hanbei, his sword held in front of him, ready for defence if Hanbei was able to strike again. Or if he was too slow, Kojuro was ready to attack. \u201cYou can't make me angry,\u201d Kojuro said quietly in a mild tone, smiling,\u201cI'm already furious.\u201d Chobei moved forward as Yasuke backed off, swinging his club in a pattern of swift moves, a figure of eight that had the advantage of protecting him and not giving away the direction of his next strike, as well as being a flashy way to intimidate his opponent. He was so far unimpressed by Yasuke's desperate swing of the sword, and fancied his chances, even though he was less well-equipped. As Chobei swung his distracting club, his other hand darted nimbly to the knife at his back and retreived it, palmed out of view. He waited for Yasuke's next strike, intending to block the sword with his club, which he figured was of strong enough wood to capture the blade, then while Yasuke was engaged, he would stab the knife into the side of his neck or another exposed area, whatever Yasuke offered up. Once he was dead, that katana would be his and it was probably worth fifty times more than what the masked ronin had paid him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hanbei's undisciplined manner gave Kojuro an opening, as he broadcast his intent with his body language, and the emotion on his face. Spotting his intent to push forward, Kojuro stepped back and to the right, letting the locked swords pivot around each other, freeing his blade as Hanbei moved forward with both his katana and kick. Hanbei's momentum, pushing against a force that no longer pushed back, propelled him forward and off balance, as Kojuro brought his tachi around in a horizontal strike to the left side of Hanbei's waist. He turned to face Hanbei, his sword held in front of him, ready for defence if Hanbei was able to strike again. Or if he was too slow, Kojuro was ready to attack. \u201cYou can't make me angry,\u201d Kojuro said quietly in a mild tone, smiling,\u201cI'm already furious.\u201d "}, "post-74232": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1508278242000", "message": "Hanbei had put too much intent into his kick-push that he lost balance and only narrowly avoided a fatal cut. The samurai in front of him had cut him though, and he was bleeding rather heavily from his waist. These guys were tough customers and this was no time to go easy on this guy as he was obviously a well trained pro. \"Why you little brat... You'll get what you deserve!\" Hanbei said as his moustache seemed to curl upwards in anger while is cheeks turned reddish. \"Come on out guys!\" he shouted as suddenly three more bandits jumped out of their hiding behind the shack. One went towards Yasuke and two against Kojuro. \"I saved this surprise for someone else, but I suppose it will do as rehearsal!\" he said and laughed with his gravelly voice that war slightly marked by the agony of feeling Kojuro's strike. Hanbei put a bit of distance between him and the opponent, as he knew the annoying samurai would be forced to concentrate on his two comrades. Maybe in the mean time Hanbei could get to stop his bleeding or change tactics if they couldn't deal with the samurai themselves. One of them was armed with a pole arm and was making small stabs at Kojuro trying to keep him at a distance and making him feel threatened without giving the opponent much in the way of openings. The other one was more offensive and using a chained kusarigama weapon, he held the kama in the right arm and swung the chain at Kojuro with the other, hoping to catch the samurai's sword  or his limbs and - if it succeded - he would disarm or pull him to the ground. He was pretty fast with those strikes, but in the end he was also very straight forward and predictable, Yasuke thought. Warding off anything in front of him with the club and probably fiddling with his knife of the back. \"Oldest trick in the book...\" Yasuke mumbled. \"I'll show you a trick you haven't seen before..!\" he added muted with a smirk as he feigned moving backwards but dug the tip of his sandal into the mud and with a front kick tossed a lump of mud into the face of the confused the opponent who by pure reflex retracted his hand towards his face offering his exposed wrist for Yasuke's sword. Yasuke had used this little party killer a couple of times before and had already stepped into his opponent's sphere and with a vertical cut he sliced his katana downards in a line that would cross directly through his wrist and probably well into his chest too. If not lethal, then at least his opponent would lose all fighting spirit. That usually happened, when you lost your most important hand.But whatever the result, Yasuke heard Hanbei call out of backup and saw one other opponent closing in from behind the shack.\"Damnit, so he was actually trying to double cross me that filthy dog..!\" Yasuke said, trying to keep his voice muted and his head cool. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hanbei had put too much intent into his kick-push that he lost balance and only narrowly avoided a fatal cut. The samurai in front of him had cut him though, and he was bleeding rather heavily from his waist. These guys were tough customers and this was no time to go easy on this guy as he was obviously a well trained pro. "}, "post-74324": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508444693000", "message": "Although Hanbei was still alive enough to call for help and scuttle away as his companions jumped out, Kojuro didn't think he would survive the wound for long. Nevertheless, he had more pressing matters to deal with as he had two men with longer range weapons wasting no time in attacking from concealment. Quickly sizing up his opponents, he judged the spearman as the greater threat. It took little skill to stab a hole through someone with a spear, but a kusarigama was a difficult and specialist weapon to wield, and judging by the state of these men and their weapons, it was more likely they had found them on a battlefield somewhere than trained strenuously to use them. Kojuro parried the spear away with his sword, knocking the business end of it to the side for moment, then while the spearman regained the balance of the weapon he darted in towards it's wielder, keeping the length of the spear in between himself and the chain that was already swinging towards him. His speed of movement coupled with the spear interfering with its trajectory should be enough to keep the kusarigama away from him for the time being, and as he rushed forward, inside the spear-wielder's effective ranger, he kept his blade at shoulder height, pointing horizontally straight in front of him, letting his forward movement propel the pointy end of the tachi blade directly into his opponent's throat in an unorthodox yet highly effective move. Chobei's face full of mud was the least of his worries as Yasuke's blow sliced off his hand and he slipped backwards into the mud on the ground, grabbing at his wrist in pure agony and disbelief. A few sobbing gasps came from him before he screamed \u201cBaaasssstaaaaaarrrd!\u201d and kept screaming between ragged breaths as he writhed on the ground, with blood pumping from his severed wrist. The ground beneath Yasuke became even slicker as the blood spread, and the sound of Chobei's screams rather muffled the approach of this new opponent. The man approached, well over six feet tall, hairy, with huge hands and feet and dressed only in a short tunic and metal shin guards, he stepped from Yasuke's left and with great force swung a huge metal kanabo, both hands around the ring at the end, that let him use his huge strength and a whirling movement to send the spiked metal end around to smack Yasuke in the side of the head. Chobei, despite his missing hand somehow had got to his knees and was slowly and messily crawling towards Yasuke, mindlessly hellbent on revenge. ", "link_list": ["https://files.tofugu.com/articles/japan/2015-08-07-ancient-japanese-weapons/Kanabo-Iron-Club.jpg"], "image_list": [], "html": "Although Hanbei was still alive enough to call for help and scuttle away as his companions jumped out, Kojuro didn't think he would survive the wound for long. Nevertheless, he had more pressing matters to deal with as he had two men with longer range weapons wasting no time in attacking from concealment. Quickly sizing up his opponents, he judged the spearman as the greater threat. It took little skill to stab a hole through someone with a spear, but a kusarigama was a difficult and specialist weapon to wield, and judging by the state of these men and their weapons, it was more likely they had found them on a battlefield somewhere than trained strenuously to use them. Kojuro parried the spear away with his sword, knocking the business end of it to the side for moment, then while the spearman regained the balance of the weapon he darted in towards it's wielder, keeping the length of the spear in between himself and the chain that was already swinging towards him. His speed of movement coupled with the spear interfering with its trajectory should be enough to keep the kusarigama away from him for the time being, and as he rushed forward, inside the spear-wielder's effective ranger, he kept his blade at shoulder height, pointing horizontally straight in front of him, letting his forward movement propel the pointy end of the tachi blade directly into his opponent's throat in an unorthodox yet highly effective move. "}, "post-74357": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1508526962000", "message": "The blood sprayed from the spear wielding bandit's throat as he, in an attempt to save himself, had let go of his spear desperately trying to parry the incoming strike with his hand. The result was predictable, as the accurate yet forceful thrust of Kojuro's sword merely sliced off the bandit's fingers before plunging through the throat leaving him going down with a few bloody coughs before succumbing to the shock enhanced rapid blood loss. The other bandit hesitated for a moment, when he saw how quickly his partner had been taken care of but quickly resumed his fighting stance.\"Luck! That's what I call that..! I won't miss with my chain twice!\" he said as he pulled the chain towards himself given it a few swings for it to gain momentum before tossing it at Kojuro once again. He had seen the quickness of this guy's reflexes, so if he was to dodge this, he would attempt to block with the kama-part of his weapon. Yasuke lifted his eyebrow slightly and couldn't believe that this guy had slipped in the mud making it so that he missed the tip of Yasuke's sword, that would no doubt have sliced well through his torso had it been solid ground.\"Fighting in the nature is always so unpredictable, wouldn't you say..? Big hairy guy!\" he said as he turned to his new foe while Chobei was writhing around in the mud screaming. A guy that big and ugly couldn't sneak up on Yasuke so easily, and as he swung his mighty weapon at Yasuke with a ferocious power behind it Yasuke noticed that Chobei was crawling it him again as he had apparently regained some of his will to fight. Yasuke took a quick decision wanting to avoid getting withing reach of the mighty bear of a man, and dodged out of reach for the first attack, stepping over in Chobei's direction. Yasuke quickly put his foot on the back of the Chobei's head, burying his face deep into the mud as he reached for the knife in Chobei's left hand, easily snatching it away because of the struggling. \"Here's a handout from your buddy!\" Yasuke said as he swung his hip and directed the force through his arm and into the throw, as the knife flew towards his opponents heart. This was a coward's knife, made for quick and consecutive stabbing, and thus thin enough to easily plunge though the ribs and pointy enough so it would go through flesh and muscle alike. If the attack would hit its mark as planned, Yasuke intended to stay on top of his friend Chobei a bit longer until the bugger had swallowed enough mud that he would be well on his way to whatever bandit kami he believed in. But in his mind Yasuke had imagined Hanbei on his way down heading the same direction as Chobei immediately after he saw Kojuro had sliced him. Surely someone like Kojuro wouldn't let him live. But although Hanbei was severely wounded, he had regained his composure and was looking around for whatever option was open to him. \"A hostage... of course..!\" he said, as he thought about the girl inside the shack. This was the straight forward solution and he could probably threaten himself to a horse and maybe escape this mess alive if his wound wasn't fatal. Either way more samurai would probably come this way soon he thought. Hanbei was just about to barge into the shack as he caught a glimpse of Yasuke sitting on top of Chobei pressing his partner's head down into the mud while looking oddly amused as a sudden realization surfaced...\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The blood sprayed from the spear wielding bandit's throat as he, in an attempt to save himself, had let go of his spear desperately trying to parry the incoming strike with his hand. The result was predictable, as the accurate yet forceful thrust of Kojuro's sword merely sliced off the bandit's fingers before plunging through the throat leaving him going down with a few bloody coughs before succumbing to the shock enhanced rapid blood loss. The other bandit hesitated for a moment, when he saw how quickly his partner had been taken care of but quickly resumed his fighting stance."}, "post-74368": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508533919000", "message": "The spearman's body collapsed to the ground and Kojuro withdrew his sword, immediately locking eyes with the kusarigama fighter as he took a stance. He seemed to the the last of his opponents, and looking a little less confident once his friend had been taken down. Kusarigama was a difficult weapon to come up against, unlike the spear, it wasn't simple possible to get within the effective range of the chain, as up close the sickle was a formidable close combat weapon. As the bandit whirled his chain to build up momentum, Kojuro already decided on his strategy, and with a swift movement sheathed his sword, that the bandit was no doubt trying to catch in his weighted chain, and drew his tanto, immediately throwing it with all his strength in the direction of his opponent.The big hairy guy was clearly extremely strong but the huge weapon in his hands made him slow and ponderous. He was gearing up for his next swing at Yasuke with his kanabo, when the small blade penetrated into his chest. At first it seemed he barely noticed the knife, as his kanabo swung in its heavy arc, but rather than completing its journey towards Yasuke, it descended downwards dragging down the limp body of the bandit by his thick fingers that were still clutched on to the kanabo's iron ring. He sprawled on the ground, dead, the hilt of the knife looking impossible small sticking up from that vast expanse of his torso. By the time his eyes rolled back into his head, Chobei had also stopped moving. His body went slack beneath Yasuke's sandal. Likely he was dead. Hanbei couldn't quite believe it. Everything around him seemed to go silent and all he could hear was the blood pounding through his veins and his own laboured breath. That man. How had he not noticed it before? That man, the one pushing his friend's head down into the mud with his foot, was none other than \u2026 the masked ronin. That double crossing scumbag, Hanbei thought venomously, outraged that the code of honour among theives had been thrown so carelessly out of the window. He treats me like dirt, now Chobei, and brings friends back to rescue the woman he brought here. Hanbei felt oddly disgusted with himself that he had followed the masked ronin's wishes and lost his chance with the woman. He sought around for a weapon, and spotted Chobei's knife sticking out of the corpse of the huge bandit. Just then, a clawed hand jutted suddenly from the mud, grabbing Yasuke around the ankle with an iron grip, and Chobei spluttered into life once more. Coughing mud, he hadn't much to say for himself, but he dragged onto Yasuke's leg and refused to let go.Hanbei took his chance. Clutching his wound he ran to the side of the big man, and yanked free the knife. If it was the last thing he did, he would have his revenge. He had been left alive for a reason, and that reason was to finish off the masked ronin. Kojuro's tanto plunged into the kusarigama man's eye and he went down with an anguished gurgling cry. He looked around. That was those two finished off, but the mud-covered man he had seen scuttling away, where was he? He had his answer quickly enough, as Hanbei launched himself towards Yasuke's back with a knife clutched in his fist. Yasuke seemed not to have even noticed as he struggled with something on the ground, and Kojuro acted on instinct. Calling Yasuke's name, even though he knew there was no chance for him to react in time, Kojuro threw himself in between Hanbei's knife and Yasuke's unprotected back, drawing his sword as Hanbei descended towards him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The spearman's body collapsed to the ground and Kojuro withdrew his sword, immediately locking eyes with the kusarigama fighter as he took a stance. He seemed to the the last of his opponents, and looking a little less confident once his friend had been taken down. Kusarigama was a difficult weapon to come up against, unlike the spear, it wasn't simple possible to get within the effective range of the chain, as up close the sickle was a formidable close combat weapon. As the bandit whirled his chain to build up momentum, Kojuro already decided on his strategy, and with a swift movement sheathed his sword, that the bandit was no doubt trying to catch in his weighted chain, and drew his tanto, immediately throwing it with all his strength in the direction of his opponent."}, "post-74383": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1508570784000", "message": "Yasuke was satisfied seeing his knife hitting the intended target bringing the big guy down and had turned his attention to Chobei beneath him. He was still struggling a bit so Yasuke put slightly more weight into the foot on his head until he finally got limp. \"That's it, you're doing good. Just go for the light, right now you could use it!\" Yasuke said with an indifferent voice but a slight smirk as he wondered if Kojuro had finished his business too. But as soon as Yasuke removed the weight from his the foot keeping Chobei's head down, his left hand clutched tightly around Yasuke's ankle as his head surfaced above the mud. \"What?!? Not that light you bastard!\" Yasuke exclaimed surprised, as he with both his hands pressed the guy's head into the mud again using all his strength. It seemed that from somewhere behind him someone yelled his name, but somehow the words got muted and the translation to danger was delayed in Yasuke's head as he had other things to see to right now. But as he felt a shadow above him, he turned around immediately, still with both hands busy on keeping Chobei down.\"K-Kojuro..!\" he said, entirely forgetting the suffix seeing the samurai's back turned towards him. Yasuke's gaze then immediately turned to the guy facing Kojuro. \"Hanbei..!\" Yasuke exclaimed, as he switched his hands with his knee still holding down Chobei but ready to draw his sword in a split second when his mind figured out what had happened. What Yasuke couldn't see was whether or not Kojuro's sword had cut Hanbei. But the fact already stood that Hanbei's knife had already penetrated into Kojuro's abdomen. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke was satisfied seeing his knife hitting the intended target bringing the big guy down and had turned his attention to Chobei beneath him. He was still struggling a bit so Yasuke put slightly more weight into the foot on his head until he finally got limp. "}, "post-74391": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508614195000", "message": "Kojuro stared at the man with a defiant smile on his face. He hadn\u2019t had the time or space to draw his sword, but he was at least confident that he had intercepted the bandit\u2019s attack on Yasuke, judging by the impact he felt just under the left side of his ribs from the bandit\u2019s weapon. He didn\u2019t need to look down and see the knife\u2019s hilt sticking out from his body to know what had happened. \u201cYou OK?\u201d he asked Yasuke, his voice a little strained, as he kept his eyes fixed on the opponent in front of him. Hanbei\u2019s angry face twisted into one of frustrated rage as he realised that instead of thrusting his knife into the Masked Ronin\u2019s kidney the other guy had got in the way instead, his last chance at revenge thwarted. \u201cYou \u2026\u201d but whatever he was going to say was cut off as the heel of Kojuro\u2019s right hand connected hard with the underside of his jaw, forcing him back half a step, his hand releasing its grip on the knife as he reeled. It gave Kojuro the clearance he needed to draw his sword, and using a spur of the moment bastardised technique of iaijutsu, sliced his blade into Hanbei\u2019s body in an upward curve. Hanbei choked on blood as he fell backwards, taking only a few moments to breathe his last.Kojuro staggered forward a step, caught himself and regained his balance, only then to fall to one knee, breathing heavily as he supported himself with the point of his tachi planted in the ground, his right hand still gripped around its hilt. His left hand went up to the knife handle protruding from his abdomen, the length of the blade buried deep inside. He looked at it for a moment, wrapped his hand around it and tried to pull it out. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<br>Kojuro stared at the man with a defiant smile on his face. He hadn\u2019t had the time or space to draw his sword, but he was at least confident that he had intercepted the bandit\u2019s attack on Yasuke, judging by the impact he felt just under the left side of his ribs from the bandit\u2019s weapon. He didn\u2019t need to look down and see the knife\u2019s hilt sticking out from his body to know what had happened. \u201cYou OK?\u201d he asked Yasuke, his voice a little strained, as he kept his eyes fixed on the opponent in front of him. <br/><br/>Hanbei\u2019s angry face twisted into one of frustrated rage as he realised that instead of thrusting his knife into the Masked Ronin\u2019s kidney the other guy had got in the way instead, his last chance at revenge thwarted. \u201cYou \u2026\u201d but whatever he was going to say was cut off as the heel of Kojuro\u2019s right hand connected hard with the underside of his jaw, forcing him back half a step, his hand releasing its grip on the knife as he reeled. It gave Kojuro the clearance he needed to draw his sword, and using a spur of the moment bastardised technique of iaijutsu, sliced his blade into Hanbei\u2019s body in an upward curve. Hanbei choked on blood as he fell backwards, taking only a few moments to breathe his last.<br/><br/>Kojuro staggered forward a step, caught himself and regained his balance, only then to fall to one knee, breathing heavily as he supported himself with the point of his tachi planted in the ground, his right hand still gripped around its hilt. His left hand went up to the knife handle protruding from his abdomen, the length of the blade buried deep inside. He looked at it for a moment, wrapped his hand around it and tried to pull it out. <br/></br>"}, "post-74394": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1508615840000", "message": "For a moment that felt like ages Yasuke sat as frozen. Although it seemed like an event that was as unlikely as sunshine in the middle of the night, this noble bastard he had cursed many time had shamelessly thrown himself in front of Yasuke and saved him from an attack from behind. Yasuke watched as Kojuro mustered strength to strike back at Hanbei before drawing sword to finally end it it. Yasuke was still paralyzed, as if his mind didn't know what to do with the information it received right now. What had happened to him? Yasuke observed as Kojuro fell to his knee and gripped his stomach. Had he been stabbed? Suddenly he felt released from his trance and with a quick and decisive kick he felt Chobei's neck snap as he hurried over to Kojuro and crouched down seeing the dagger still stuck in his abdomen. The thought of Hanbei being able to place that where ever he wanted in Yasuke's back scared him. What kind of guy did this for someone he hardly knew?\"Leave it for now..!\" Yasuke said and put his hand Kojuro's. \"If you just pull it out the blood loss will get you in no time!\" Yasuke said before looking at him with an inquisitive glance. \"Why though..? Why would you do such a stupid thing?!?\" Yasuke said and chuckled nervously as if he wished to hear that Kojuro had done it by accident. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "For a moment that felt like ages Yasuke sat as frozen. Although it seemed like an event that was as unlikely as sunshine in the middle of the night, this noble bastard he had cursed many time had shamelessly thrown himself in front of Yasuke and saved him from an attack from behind. Yasuke watched as Kojuro mustered strength to strike back at Hanbei before drawing sword to finally end it it. Yasuke was still paralyzed, as if his mind didn't know what to do with the information it received right now. What had happened to him? Yasuke observed as Kojuro fell to his knee and gripped his stomach. Had he been stabbed? "}, "post-74396": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508617463000", "message": "Kojuro looked up at Yasuke as he put his hand on top of his own. For now, he paused what he was about to do in the face of Yasuke\u2019s advice. His next question had Kojuro momentarily silenced. What did he mean? \u201cBecause we\u2019re comrades,\u201d he replied, with the air of having to explain something entirely obvious. \u201cBesides, I\u2019m known for doing stupid things\u2026\u201d he gave a shaky smile. \u201cTalking of which, I\u2019m pulling this thing out anyway. How much worse could it get?\u201d he laughed quietly, before a twinge of pain wiped the smile from his face. He looked intently at the door to the shack. \u201cI can\u2019t have Nakatani see this, it will frighten her. Help me get it out, and quick. I don\u2019t want to leave her in there any longer\u2026\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro looked up at Yasuke as he put his hand on top of his own. For now, he paused what he was about to do in the face of Yasuke\u2019s advice. His next question had Kojuro momentarily silenced. What did he mean? \u201cBecause we\u2019re comrades,\u201d he replied, with the air of having to explain something entirely obvious. \u201cBesides, I\u2019m known for doing stupid things\u2026\u201d he gave a shaky smile. \u201cTalking of which, I\u2019m pulling this thing out anyway. How much worse could it get?\u201d he laughed quietly, before a twinge of pain wiped the smile from his face. He looked intently at the door to the shack. \u201cI can\u2019t have Nakatani see this, it will frighten her. Help me get it out, and quick. I don\u2019t want to leave her in there any longer\u2026\u201d "}, "post-74400": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1508619066000", "message": "Yasuke looked around as if making sure the the area was clear of any lurking enemies. But what did he just say? Comrades? Yasuke sure as hell wasn't anyone's comrade and he would have sworn that would never happen until now. Now at least he appeared to be someone's comrade, and judging by action Kojuro meant it. He shook his head. This was foolish, at least thinking about that right now didn't have any meaning to Yasuke.\"Bloody wait then..!\" Yasuke said annoyed, knowing this guy wasn't going to be swayed in his decision. Yasuke had had a few wounds like that, but learned to borrow remedies from his enemies. He hurried over to Hanbei and unraveled the guy's belt. Being made of cloth it was very capable of being a sort of bandage. \"And what do we have here..!\" Yasuke said and smirked as he found a more than half full hip flask inside Hanbei's kimono top. Yasuke went back to Kojuro and gave him the hip flask. \"Take nice large sip, this is going to hurt a bit!\" Yasuke said and narrowed his eyes. Whether Kojuro obliged or not, he would use the last of the alchohol to soak and bundle up a piece of cloth. \"Let me do it...\" Yasuke said and looked Kojuro in the eyes. Being sure that he had his consent, he pulled out dagger in a swift motion and applied the alchohol soaked cloth bud, quickly tightening the rest of the belt around hos torso so it would keep it firmly in place for now.\"Look, this should stop the blood loss for now, just don't over exert yourself. I'm not a medic, neither can I make miracles!\" Yasuke said and paused. \"But yeah... I suppose... Thanks...\" Yasuke said bluntly and quickly swung Kojuro's arm over his shoulder supporting him while he walked towards the shack. But even in this state, he was still thinking of that girl? Was he some kind of saint? It was odd to hear him talk about Nakatani like that. It was almost as if he had figured he couldn't keep their relationship a secret to Yasuke. This only served to confirm Nakatani's words. Yasuke then opened the door to the shack as they stepped inside, finding Nakatani inside.\"Hey, don't be afraid now. It's all over!\" Yasuke said firmly and looked at Naka, trying to strain a smile, praying to whatever responsible kami that she wouldn't go figuring out who Yasuke really was like the dead Hanbei fellow. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke looked around as if making sure the the area was clear of any lurking enemies. But what did he just say? Comrades? Yasuke sure as hell wasn't anyone's comrade and he would have sworn that would never happen until now. Now at least he appeared to be someone's comrade, and judging by action Kojuro meant it. He shook his head. This was foolish, at least thinking about that right now didn't have any meaning to Yasuke."}, "post-74405": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508621237000", "message": "Waiting for Yasuke to wander about doing all manner of random tasks was extremely frustrating, as he imagined Nakatani listening to the sounds of violence outside, wondering why it had all gone quiet, maybe assuming that they were dead, and he was a second from just pulling out the knife himself, no matter that he would have to let go of his prop to do it and use both hands. But Yasuke arrived in the nick of time with whatever he had collected from the battlefield. Kojuro refused the flask of sake with a shake of his head. \u201cIt\u2019s fine,\u201d he replied. He wasn\u2019t afraid of feeling pain, and samurai pride wouldn\u2019t allow him to accept.  Nodding as he returned Yasuke\u2019s gaze steadily, he let his comrade swiftly pull the blade from his flesh. He braced himself as much as possible, his jaw clenched, but still, when the knife blade came free he let out a groan of pain, and felt his vision go white as he came close to passing out. He barely registered what Yasuke was doing as he bandaged the wound, except for the pain only growing more intense as he pressed the cloth onto the wound and tightened the bandage. Though his skin had paled considerably and sweat ran down his forehead, Kojuro felt more of his consciousness returning to him as a few seconds passed by. \u201cMm,\u201d he agreed to Yasuke\u2019s instructions, \u201cthanks.\u201d Once again Yasuke was treated to a wan smile that looked less convincing than ever. He let Yasuke get him to his feet, but as they approached the door, he removed himself from the supporting shoulder, wanting to enter of his own accord. \u201cNakatani!\u201d he moved over to her as fast as his injury would allow, and instantly gathered her into his arms. \u201cYou\u2019re safe now. Did they \u2013 are you hurt?\u201d he asked with a deep and genuine concern, searching her eyes for answers. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Waiting for Yasuke to wander about doing all manner of random tasks was extremely frustrating, as he imagined Nakatani listening to the sounds of violence outside, wondering why it had all gone quiet, maybe assuming that they were dead, and he was a second from just pulling out the knife himself, no matter that he would have to let go of his prop to do it and use both hands. But Yasuke arrived in the nick of time with whatever he had collected from the battlefield. Kojuro refused the flask of sake with a shake of his head. \u201cIt\u2019s fine,\u201d he replied. He wasn\u2019t afraid of feeling pain, and samurai pride wouldn\u2019t allow him to accept.  "}, "post-74462": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1508776879000", "message": "Naka had dragged herself to one of the corners of the building, the blindfold still around her eyes. Somehow she didn't dare to take it off even after many minutes had passed. She was to scared. Every breath she took was starting to hurt as her chest was starting to feel more sore from the bruising she had sustained during the ride to the shack. She felt miserable and every single minute seemed to last a life time. Her ears were picking up any sounds from outside. Anytime one of the bandits put their backs against the wood of the shed she would jump, thinking someone was inside the shack with her, but there never was. Suddenly fighting was heard. She could hear shouting and screams, but all of them were to muffled to make out what they were. She wanted to shout for help, but her voice got stuck in her throat. Who was out there fighting anyway? Were they there to help her? Did the bandits start to fight among themselves? She didn't know. And she wouldn't know until the door of the shack swung open. When Yasuke was the first to speak she instantly panicked. Though he was distorted his voice before, it was still familiar to her in that first instant, especially since her captor was one of the people that she expected to open the door. \"No! Stay away from me!\" she suddenly shouted and pushed herself into the corner even more then she had before. Only when the voice of Kojuro followed after she frooze and her fear turning into confusion. \"K-kojuro-san..?\" she whispered softly, the tears already welling up in her eyes. Before she knew it he had gathered her inside of his arms, his warmth against her and his cheek against her face. She didn't even feel the need to remove the blindfold, she knew it was him. It smelled like him and it felt like him. She started to sob uncontrollably, all the tension and fear she had felt in the last hours pouring out of her. She couldn't even find her voice to speak, she just sobbed into him, her arms as tight around him as she could possibly get them. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Naka had dragged herself to one of the corners of the building, the blindfold still around her eyes. Somehow she didn't dare to take it off even after many minutes had passed. She was to scared. Every breath she took was starting to hurt as her chest was starting to feel more sore from the bruising she had sustained during the ride to the shack. She felt miserable and every single minute seemed to last a life time. "}, "post-74518": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1508874515000", "message": "Kojuro eased the blindfold from Nakatani\u2019s eyes and over her head, it was already damp with her tears. He let her cry, stroking hair to comfort her, infinitley relieved that she was here, alive, and \u2013 so it seemed for now at least \u2013 all in one piece. He couldn't imagine what she had been through but her heavy sobs spoke volumes. Without looking up, he addressed Yasuke. \u201cCould you go bring up the horses?\u201d His voice was heavy with repressed emotion, drawn tight with pain.\u201cBe careful out there,\u201d he added. Though now was not the time to mention it, they still hadn't found the mysterious masked ronin, or at least Yasuke hadn't pointed him out. \u201cYou're safe now,\u201d he reassured Nakatani, feeling her tears wet on his skin and the front of his kimono. He continued to hold on to her, though when her embrace tightened around him, his body tensed involuntarily and he drew in a sharp breath as his wound let him know in no uncertain terms that this was not a comfortable position.\u00a0Still, he didn't really want to let her go, not now he had just found her again.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro eased the blindfold from Nakatani\u2019s eyes and over her head, it was already damp with her tears. He let her cry, stroking hair to comfort her, infinitley relieved that she was here, alive, and \u2013 so it seemed for now at least \u2013 all in one piece. He couldn't imagine what she had been through but her heavy sobs spoke volumes. Without looking up, he addressed Yasuke. \u201cCould you go bring up the horses?\u201d His voice was heavy with repressed emotion, drawn tight with pain.\u201cBe careful out there,\u201d he added. Though now was not the time to mention it, they still hadn't found the mysterious masked ronin, or at least Yasuke hadn't pointed him out. \u201cYou're safe now,\u201d he reassured Nakatani, feeling her tears wet on his skin and the front of his kimono. He continued to hold on to her, though when her embrace tightened around him, his body tensed involuntarily and he drew in a sharp breath as his wound let him know in no uncertain terms that this was not a comfortable position.\u00a0Still, he didn't really want to let her go, not now he had just found her again.\u00a0"}, "post-74755": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1509297083000", "message": "Yasuke froze when seeing her reaction to his voice. Did she figure it out? No, she was probably just afraid right now and any first voise would have scared her. But when Kojuro asked Yasuke to get the horses, he didn't hesitate taking him up on it. \"Yes of course Hizashi-dono!\" Yasuke said and hurried out of the door. Hopefully Kojuro could calm her down so she wouldn't suspect Yasuke and his behavior too much. As he stepped outside, he stopped a bit and looked at the dead thugs lying about on the muddy ground. With a smirk he almost tip toed over to Hanbei and Chobei seaching their clothes for the gold he had paid them. He gave the door to the shack a sidelong glance, but Kojuro didn't show up and he managed to get a small sack of gold from both of them. As he made his rounds he found one of the bandits dead with a tanto stuck in his eye and he kicked him lightly. \"Hmm yeah, that one's dead too.\" Yasuke said, before grabbing a few coins off his body too. \"Kojuro would probably forget this too, if I don't take it.\" he said and yanked the tanto out of the poor fellow's skull. Why he cared about that, he didn't really now. But it kind of bothered him that he did. The horses were still there and after looting the peeing bandit of his gold, he secured Kojuro's tanto to the horse's saddle. \"You'll get to clean the eye-stuff off yourself though...\" Yasuke said to himself as he took the leashes and started maneuvering the horses up the muddy hill. It was a slow process, and there was a reason he let his own horse stay at the foot of it initially. \"But sure, let's treat her to the princess way of transport on the way back...\" Yasuke sighed and shrugged his shoulders. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Yasuke froze when seeing her reaction to his voice. Did she figure it out? No, she was probably just afraid right now and any first voise would have scared her. But when Kojuro asked Yasuke to get the horses, he didn't hesitate taking him up on it. "}, "post-74948": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1509524368000", "message": "It took a while before the sobbing would subside and exhaustion would take over Nakatani's mind. She felt foggy and woozy, the stress of the day finally taking its toll on her. But she knew that she was safe now, she knew that Kojuro would do anything to make sure she would be. She no longer paid a mind to Yasuke in the back of the room and just leaned into Kojuro with her eyes closed, the tears slowing down and the sobbing stopped. After several minutes she felt able to move her body again, the soreness in her bruised chest now becoming more apparent, and the place where her wrist has been bound starting to turn slightly blue as well from how tight they had been. \"I just want to go to the mansion.\" she said softly, just wanting to get away from this horrible shack. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It took a while before the sobbing would subside and exhaustion would take over Nakatani's mind. She felt foggy and woozy, the stress of the day finally taking its toll on her. But she knew that she was safe now, she knew that Kojuro would do anything to make sure she would be. She no longer paid a mind to Yasuke in the back of the room and just leaned into Kojuro with her eyes closed, the tears slowing down and the sobbing stopped. "}, "post-75032": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1509716081000", "message": "Kojuro just sat with her, letting her cry as he held her. She hadn't answered his questions, maybe she couldn't bring herself to. He didn't push her on it, but once she finally began to move and release her tight hold on him, he was able to notice, even in the dim light of the windowless shack, the bruises that had started to appear on her wrists. Taking her hand in his he looked down at the marks sadly. \u201cYes, let's go home,\u201d he replied. Now that the heightened state of battle was wearing off, he was beginning to feel the pain of his wound more acutely, and he had no reason to want to linger here either. The sooner they could get back the better. \u201cNakatani,\u201d he said, looking her in the eyes, \u201cWhen we get outside, don't look down. Just walk straight ahead towards the horses.\u201d He was hoping to spare her more trauma, as undoubtedly all the spilled blood and mutilated bodies wouldn't make a particularly welcome sight after the ordeal she had gone through. Even though some would have been pleased to see the results of revenge taken on their behalf, he sincerely doubted that applied to Nakatani, always a kind and gentle person. Kojuro got to his feet, a little unsteady, keeping hold of Nakatani's hand. He took a couple of steps towards the door before a wave of nausea and dizziness hit him, and he caught himself doorframe with his fee arm, letting it take his weight. He leant his forehead against his arm, feeling as though he were about to pass out or throw up or both. He took a few breaths, and tried to recover himself. Just as Yasuke had predicted, the loss of blood was taking its toll, he recognised its effects. His hand slipped from Nakatani's and he put it to the wound in his stomach. No doubt Yasuke's bandaging had somewhat helped but he still felt sticky blood on his fingers and knew that would be the least of it as most of the bleeding would be inside. \u201c Just \u2026 give me a moment,\u201d he said, not yet daring to move in case he fell. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro just sat with her, letting her cry as he held her. She hadn't answered his questions, maybe she couldn't bring herself to. He didn't push her on it, but once she finally began to move and release her tight hold on him, he was able to notice, even in the dim light of the windowless shack, the bruises that had started to appear on her wrists. Taking her hand in his he looked down at the marks sadly. \u201cYes, let's go home,\u201d he replied. Now that the heightened state of battle was wearing off, he was beginning to feel the pain of his wound more acutely, and he had no reason to want to linger here either. The sooner they could get back the better. "}, "post-75049": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1509742967000", "message": "With a lot of difficulty Yasuke had lead both horses up the small hill and had led them over close to the entrance to the shack when he saw Kojuro struggling to continue to walk. Yasuke gave the horses a quick and stern gaze. \"You guys..! Stay here!\" he said as he took a few long steps to reach the entrance. Yasuke firmly grabbed the arm Kojuro used to lean himself against the door frame and put it around his shoulders to support him, while his other arm had a firm grab around the collar to further keep him up. No polite questions asked this time. It was in fact a throwing grab from a school of martial art, but it seemed handy in this situation too though it made it so he almost carried Kojuro on his back instead of supporting him and his toes would only just reach the ground. \"Come on, the horse will be able to take you the rest of the way, just don't strain yourself.\" he said as he walked Kojuro to the horse. \"Okay, no showing off your manliness right now! Can you make it home without losing conscioisness?\" Yasuke asked as he looked skeptically at Kojuro's wound. \"You should have let that knife stay there if you ask me...\" he said and frowned currently not minding Naka's presence. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "With a lot of difficulty Yasuke had lead both horses up the small hill and had led them over close to the entrance to the shack when he saw Kojuro struggling to continue to walk. Yasuke gave the horses a quick and stern gaze. \"You guys..! Stay here!\" he said as he took a few long steps to reach the entrance. Yasuke firmly grabbed the arm Kojuro used to lean himself against the door frame and put it around his shoulders to support him, while his other arm had a firm grab around the collar to further keep him up. No polite questions asked this time. It was in fact a throwing grab from a school of martial art, but it seemed handy in this situation too though it made it so he almost carried Kojuro on his back instead of supporting him and his toes would only just reach the ground. "}, "post-75108": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1509911154000", "message": "Nakatani would get up at the same time as Kojuro and walk with him towards the door, only when he suddenly seemed to lose his footing and caught himself against the doorframe she was able to snap out of her self-pity. She remembered... There had been bandits outside of the shack and before Kojuro had come into the shack, she had heard fighting. She suddenly got white on her face and light-headed herself before she got in front of him and took a good look at him. She could see the blood that was under his hand and the long stain that was making its way down his legs. She gasped and moved her hands in front of her mouth. She had been so worried about herself, that she had not cared about seeing if Kojuro had been okay. He was way worse of then she was, and only because she had been stupid enough to visit the shrine on her own. \"You are hurt... I am so sorry, Kojuro-san, please... I am so sorry.\" she sobbed softly when Yasuke came towards them. She still felt a sensation of fear when he got closer to her, but she knew they had to get help for Kojuro as soon as they could. She would walk close to them, letting Yasuke hold him up as they walked towards the horses. \"I can stay on a horse with him, make sure he doesn't fall from the saddle.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nakatani would get up at the same time as Kojuro and walk with him towards the door, only when he suddenly seemed to lose his footing and caught himself against the doorframe she was able to snap out of her self-pity. "}, "post-75137": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1510002834000", "message": "Kojuro realised that he had failed in his attempt to not worry Nakatani. Her crying was the last thing he wanted to hear at that moment, but as much as he wanted to smile at her and tell her he was fine and everything was alright, he knew it was too late for that. But he couldn't accept her thinking that she was to blame. \u201cPlease, Naka-chan. It's my fault. I was careless,\u201d he replied, hoping it would relieve her guilt. In the next moment, Yasuke, with no regard for either of their feelings, picked Kojuro up and slung him over his shoulder carrying him towards the horses. If Kojuro objected to being picked up like a sack of rice and marched about he didn't have the strength to protest it, and soon enough found himself by the horses, with Yasuke frowning at his wound. Could he make it home without losing consciousness? He wasn't sure of the answer and didn't understand how he would be able to give an accurate prediction. \u201cI'll try,\u201d he said at length. It was the best he could do right now. \u201cMm, probably,\u201d he conceded to Yasuke's observation. It might have been better but then \u2026 he might not have been able to calm Nakatani down as he had done, with a knife hilt sticking jauntily out of him. While they debated how best to get home, Kojuro took a moment to rest, knowing the ride ahead would be strenuous even though the horse would be doing most of the work. Gin recognised Nakatani and gently nosed at her shoulder, huffing a hot breath onto her. If Nakatani was to ride her, no doubt the horse would be amenable to it, as she seemed to appreciate Nakatani's company. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Kojuro realised that he had failed in his attempt to not worry Nakatani. Her crying was the last thing he wanted to hear at that moment, but as much as he wanted to smile at her and tell her he was fine and everything was alright, he knew it was too late for that. But he couldn't accept her thinking that she was to blame. \u201cPlease, Naka-chan. It's my fault. I was careless,\u201d he replied, hoping it would relieve her guilt. In the next moment, Yasuke, with no regard for either of their feelings, picked Kojuro up and slung him over his shoulder carrying him towards the horses. "}, "post-75151": {"user": "Yasuke Shisou", "user_num": 2496, "timestamp": "1510050057000", "message": "To Yasuke it seemed like Nakatani had shaken off some of her fear when seeing Kojuro like this and he thought she might be useful in assisting.\"If you want to really help, you have to sit behind Hizashi-dono and keep pressure on the wound so he doesn't lose anymore blood. I've rolled a piece of cloth together and strapped it to his wound, you just have to keep it tightly pressed. Can you do that?\" Yasuke asked intently. \"Or else I'll have to do it...\" Yasuke said and smirked at Kojuro before getting serious again. \"You won't make it all the way home if you lose much more blood than this. She needs to help out.\" Yasuke argued, figuring by Kojuro's expression and words to Nakatani that he was trying to spare her as much as possible. If Kojuro and Naka agreed, he would offer his help to get both Kojuro and Nakatani on the horse with Kojuro going first. \"I won't let you die before even getting onto the horse though. Forgive me, Hizashi-dono!\" he said as he promptly turned Kojuro towards the horse before grabbing him beneath the arm pits as you would do when lifting an infant. \"Up you go...!!\" he said as he put all his strength into lifting Kojuro up so he wouldn't have to risk straining himself too much when mounting the horse.\"You too, madam.\" Yasuke said as he turned to Nakatani. If she agreed he would quickly lift her her onto the horse in a swift movement the same way he did with Kojuro trying to avoid too much physical contact as that might arise suspicion to him. But not offering to help her would be even more suspicious. \"Now the pain will keep him focused too, so don't ease off on the pressure..!\" Yasuke said as he mounted his own horse, ready to ride back to the mansion. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "To Yasuke it seemed like Nakatani had shaken off some of her fear when seeing Kojuro like this and he thought she might be useful in assisting."}, "post-75203": {"user": "Nakatani", "user_num": 426, "timestamp": "1510248806000", "message": "She didn't feel less guilthy, her mind was still very confused and exhausted. The feeling of Gin her nose on her shoulder instantly made Nakatani feel a wave of relief wash over her. The animal was gentle and the warmth of her breath was soothing. She petted the horse gently over her velvet like soft nose while she listened to Kojuro and Yasuke. \"I can do that,\" she said as Yasuke explained to her what she needed to do. \"But Kojuro needs to lead Gin, I can't hold the reins at the same time,\" she said a little bit anxious. She knew Gin would not throw her off, but she wasn't as confident in leading her home. Luckily this gave her a good excuse. When Yasuke approached her to help her on the horse, her first reaction was to back away from him. Anytime he seemed to get in her personal space, a weird feeling of fear overtook her, even if she didn't know why it did herself. It took her a few good breaths before she could tell him it was okay to help her up. Once on the horse she gently searched for the wound on Kojuro's abdomen and pressed down on it firmly, hoping it would not cause him to much pain, and if it did she apologized. her other arm she wrapped gently around him the other way, embracing him against herself with her chest closely against his back. Her face resting against one of his shoulders and once again she was able to calm down. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She didn't feel less guilthy, her mind was still very confused and exhausted. The feeling of Gin her nose on her shoulder instantly made Nakatani feel a wave of relief wash over her. The animal was gentle and the warmth of her breath was soothing. She petted the horse gently over her velvet like soft nose while she listened to Kojuro and Yasuke. \"I can do that,\" she said as Yasuke explained to her what she needed to do. \"But Kojuro needs to lead Gin, I can't hold the reins at the same time,\" she said a little bit anxious. She knew Gin would not throw her off, but she wasn't as confident in leading her home. Luckily this gave her a good excuse. "}, "post-75221": {"user": "Kojuro Hizashi", "user_num": 2287, "timestamp": "1510351682000", "message": "He nodded to Yasuke. He seemed to have things figured out, so Kojuro just trusted he knew what he was doing. But before they got going, he had one question. He drew Yasuke close enough to talk to him in a whisper out of earshot -he hoped- of Nakatani. \"Those men we killed - was one of them the masked ronin? Did you see him?\" he asked, looking him directly in the eyes. Was it all over and done, or was the kidnapper still out there on the loose? If he was, he would have to be found and killed. \"Make sure we get him,\" he said, knowing he might not be in a state to give orders later. Yasuke was impressively strong, and had Kojuro on Gin's back in one swift move before he even really registered what was happening. He took hold of the reins, looping the cord over his left hand to keep a grip on it. Nakatani was placed behind him, and as Yasuke had instructed her, put her hand over Kojuro's wound and pressed on it firmly to try to stop or at least slow the bleeding. The pain was already bad but it raised to a level of being barely tolerable as Nakatani applied pressure and kept it there. A groan escaped from his throat, and his breathing was shallow and fast, but when she apologised, he shook his head and replied, \"its alright.\" Better to be in pain and alive than stupidly bleed to death on the way home. Her arms were wrapped around him and she leaned against his back, it was a comforting closeness, and he knew that the last thing she wanted was to cause him pain. He rested his right hand along her forearm, the only part of her that he could reach totouch.The journey home was not a comfortable one. Gin, thankfully, did not need much in the way of directing from Kojuro, she just followed Yasuke's horse, albeit not wishing to go too fast in deference to the condition of her riders. Kojuro drifted. The pain took him to the verge of passing out several times, only to jolt him back to consciousness as it fluctuated from bad to worse. But still, he managed to keep his seat with Naka holding him from behind, and in time the Hizashi Mansion would start to become visible from between the trees, and he was still alive.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He nodded to Yasuke. He seemed to have things figured out, so Kojuro just trusted he knew what he was doing. But before they got going, he had one question. He drew Yasuke close enough to talk to him in a whisper out of earshot -he hoped- of Nakatani. \"Those men we killed - was one of them the masked ronin? Did you see him?\" he asked, looking him directly in the eyes. Was it all over and done, or was the kidnapper still out there on the loose? If he was, he would have to be found and killed. \"Make sure we get him,\" he said, knowing he might not be in a state to give orders later. "}}